Washington statutes.
RCW 9.41.080

Delivery to ineligible persons.

No person may deliver a firearm to any person whom he or she has reasonable cause to believe: (1) Is ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 to possess a firearm or (2) has signed a valid voluntary waiver of firearm rights that has not been revoked under RCW 9.41.350. Any person violating this section is guilty of a class C felony, punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

[ 2018 c 145 s 3; 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 409; 1935 c 172 s 8; RRS s 2516-8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 145 ss 1, 3, and 4: See note following RCW 9.41.350.

Finding—Intent—Severability—1994 sp.s. c 7: See notes following RCW 43.70.540.

Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 7 ss 401-410, 413-416, 418-437, and 439-460: See note following RCW 9.41.010.